California, session 20252026, SB1323.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 24250 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:24250. (a) (1) A health care provider entity shall establish or amend procedures for monitoring, documenting, and receiving visitors to health care provider entities consistent with this chapter. Health care provider entities shall post a “notice to authorities” at the facility’s main public entrances. The notice shall state that no person will be permitted to access nonpublic areas of a facility for immigration enforcement purposes unless required by state or federal law or pursuant to a valid physical judicial warrant or court order.(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “main public entrance” means a singular entrance, as designated by the facility, that serves as a primary point of access that patients and visitors use to enter the main health facility’s building.(b) (1) Health care provider entity personnel shall immediately notify health care provider entity management, administration, or legal counsel of any request for access to a health care provider entity site or patient for immigration enforcement.(2) Health care provider entity personnel shall immediately provide any requests for review of health care provider entity documents, including through a lawfully issued subpoena, warrant, or court order, to health care provider entity management, administration, or legal counsel.(3) If a request is made to access a health care provider entity site or patient, including to obtain information about a patient or their family, for immigration enforcement, health care provider entity personnel shall direct that request to the designated health care provider entity management, administrator, or legal counsel.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 24250 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:24250. (a) A health care provider entity shall, to the extent possible, establish or amend procedures for monitoring, documenting, and receiving visitors to health care provider entities consistent with this chapter. Health care provider entities are encouraged to post a “notice to authorities” at facility entrances.(b) (1) Health care provider entity personnel shall immediately notify health care provider entity management, administration, or legal counsel of any request for access to a health care provider entity site or patient for immigration enforcement.(2) Health care provider entity personnel shall immediately provide any requests for review of health care provider entity documents, including through a lawfully issued subpoena, warrant, or court order, to health care provider entity management, administration, or legal counsel.(3) If a request is made to access a health care provider entity site or patient, including to obtain information about a patient or their family, for immigration enforcement, health care provider entity personnel shall direct that request to the designated health care provider entity management, administrator, or legal counsel.(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.SEC. 3. Section 24251 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:24251. (a) To enhance privacy available to facility users and promote a safe environment conducive to the facility’s mission and patient care, a health care provider entity shall designate areas where patients are receiving treatment or care, or where a patient is discussing protected health information, as nonpublic. The facility is encouraged to designate these areas through mapping, signage, key entry, policy, or a combination of those.(b) Unless required by state or federal law, a health care provider entity and its personnel shall not allow any person access to the nonpublic areas of the facility, as described in subdivision (a), for immigration enforcement purposes, unless that person has a valid physical judicial warrant or court order that specifically grants access to the nonpublic areas of the facility.(c) A health care provider entity and its personnel shall, to the extent possible, have the denial of permission for access to nonpublic areas of the facility pursuant to subdivision (b) witnessed and documented by at least one health care provider entity personnel.(d) Health care provider entities shall inform staff and relevant volunteers on how to respond to requests relating to immigration enforcement that grants access to health care provider entity sites or to patients.(e) Health care provider entities shall inform staff and relevant volunteers on how to respond to requests by a person who is in lawful custody by immigration enforcement to notify a family member or designated support person about their current location.(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 24251 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:24251. (a) To enhance privacy available to facility users and promote a safe environment conducive to the facility’s mission and patient care, a health care provider entity shall designate areas where patients are receiving treatment or care, or where a patient is discussing protected health information, as nonpublic. The facility is encouraged to designate these areas through mapping, signage, key entry, policy, or a combination of those.(b) Unless required by state or federal law, a health care provider entity and its personnel shall not allow any person access to the nonpublic areas of the facility, as described in subdivision (a), for immigration enforcement purposes, unless that person has a valid judicial warrant or court order that specifically grants access to the nonpublic areas of the facility.(c) A health care provider entity and its personnel shall, to the extent possible, have the denial of permission for access to nonpublic areas of the facility pursuant to subdivision (b) witnessed and documented by at least one health care provider entity personnel.(d) Health care provider entities shall inform staff and relevant volunteers on how to respond to requests relating to immigration enforcement that grants access to health care provider entity sites or to patients.(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.SEC. 5. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.